tools/nvda/louis/tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Unified English Braille Code (Grade 2)
#
# -----------
#-name: Unified English braille, grade 2
#-index-name: English, unified, contracted
#-display-name: Unified English contracted braille
#
#+language:en
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
#+system:ueb
#
# TODO: Please add a reference to official documentation about
# the implemented braille code. Preferably submit the documents
# to https://github.com/liblouis/braille-specs.
# -----------
#
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2008 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#  Copyright (C) 2016 American Printing House for the Blind, Inc. www.aph.org
#  Copyright (C) 2016 Joseph Lee <joseph.lee22590@gmail.com>
#  Copyright (C) 2019-2025 RNIB <www.rnib.org.uk>
#  Copyright (C) 2022 Krzysztof Drewniak <krzysdrewniak@gmail.com>
#  Copyright (C) 2023-2024 Anthony Tibbs
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-maintainer: James Bowden <james.bowden@rnib.org.uk>
#-author: John J. Boyer <john.boyer@jjb-software.com>
#-author: Mike Gray <mgray@aph.org>
#-author: Joseph Lee <joseph.lee22590@gmail.com>
#-author: Krzysztof Drewniak <krzysdrewniak@gmail.com>

include en-ueb-g1.ctb

multind 56-6 nocontractsign capsletter

seqdelimiter -—
seqdelimiter ‐   \x2010
seqdelimiter ‑   \x2011
seqdelimiter –   \x2013
seqdelimiter —   \x2014
seqdelimiter ―   \x2015

seqbeforechars ([{"“'‘
seqafterchars  )]}"”'’.,;:.!?…
seqafterpattern 'd
seqafterpattern 'll
seqafterpattern 're
seqafterpattern 's
seqafterpattern 't
seqafterpattern 've
seqafterpattern ’d
seqafterpattern ’ll
seqafterpattern ’re
seqafterpattern ’s
seqafterpattern ’t
seqafterpattern ’ve
#TODO:  all caps words (see lou_translateString.c:inSequence()
seqafterpattern 'D
seqafterpattern 'LL
seqafterpattern 'RE
seqafterpattern 'S
seqafterpattern 'T
seqafterpattern 'VE
seqafterexpression '([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E)
seqafterpattern ’D
seqafterpattern ’LL
seqafterpattern ’RE
seqafterpattern ’S
seqafterpattern ’T
seqafterpattern ’VE
seqafterexpression ’([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E)

#   7  Punctuation
#  - 7.1.3  could be read as contraction
match %[^_]|%[^_~]%<*[([{] ; %[^_]|[)}\\]]%>*%[^_~] 56-23
#     or a word-initial groupsign
match %[^_~]%<* . %a 56-256
match %[^_~]%<* : %a 56-25
match %[^_~]%<* ; %a 56-23

#   10.1   Alphabetic Wordsigns
#   - 10.1.1   standing alone
#   - 10.1.2   followed by 'd, 'll, 're, 's, 't, 've and standing alone
#   - 2.6.4

#   must be before contractions?
match %[^_~]%<* as (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1356
match %[^_~]%<* but (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12
match %[^_~]%<* can (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 14
match %[^_~]%<* do (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 145
match %[^_~]%<* every (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 15
match %[^_~]%<* from (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 124
match %[^_~]%<* go (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1245
match %[^_~]%<* have (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 125
match %[^_~]%<* it (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1346
match %[^_~]%<* just (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 245
match %[^_~]%<* knowledge (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13
match %[^_~]%<* like (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 123
match %[^_~]%<* more (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 134
match %[^_~]%<* not (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1345
match %[^_~]%<* people (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1234
match %[^_~]%<* quite (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 12345
match %[^_~]%<* rather (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1235
match %[^_~]%<* so (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 234
match %[^_~]%<* that (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345
match %[^_~]%<* us (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 136
match %[^_~]%<* very (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1236
match %[^_~]%<* will (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2456
match %[^_~]%<* you (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 13456

nofor word as  1356
nofor word but  12
nofor word can  14
nofor word do  145
nofor word every  15
nofor word from  124
nofor word go  1245
nofor word have  125
nofor word it  1346
nofor word just  245
nofor word knowledge  13
nofor word like  123
nofor word more  134
nofor word not  1345
nofor word people  1234
nofor word quite  12345
nofor word rather  1235
nofor word so  234
nofor word that  2345
nofor word us  136
nofor word very  1236
nofor word will  2456
nofor word you  13456

nofor word but's 12-3-234
nofor word but’s 12-3-234
nofor word can's 14-3-234
nofor word can’s 14-3-234
nofor word can't 14-3-2345
nofor word can’t 14-3-2345
nofor word do's 145-3-234
nofor word do’s 145-3-234
nofor word go's 1245-3-234
nofor word go’s 1245-3-234
nofor word have's 125-3-234
nofor word have’s 125-3-234
nofor word it'd 1346-3-145
nofor word it’d 1346-3-145
nofor word it'll 1346-3-123-123
nofor word it’ll 1346-3-123-123
nofor word it's 1346-3-234
nofor word it’s 1346-3-234
nofor word knowledge's 13-3-234
nofor word knowledge’s 13-3-234
nofor word like's 123-3-234
nofor word like’s 123-3-234
nofor word more's 134-3-234
nofor word more’s 134-3-234
nofor word people's 1234-3-234
nofor word people’s 1234-3-234
nofor word so's 234-3-234
nofor word so’s 234-3-234
nofor word that'd 2345-3-145
nofor word that’d 2345-3-145
nofor word that'll 2345-3-123-123
nofor word that’ll 2345-3-123-123
nofor word that're 2345-3-1235-15
nofor word that’re 2345-3-1235-15
nofor word that's 2345-3-234
nofor word that’s 2345-3-234
nofor word that've 2345-3-1236-15
nofor word that’ve 2345-3-1236-15
nofor word will's 2456-3-234
nofor word will’s 2456-3-234
nofor word will've 2456-3-1236-15
nofor word will’ve 2456-3-1236-15
nofor word you'd 13456-3-145
nofor word you’d 13456-3-145
nofor word you'll 13456-3-123-123
nofor word you’ll 13456-3-123-123
nofor word you're 13456-3-1235-15
nofor word you’re 13456-3-1235-15
nofor word you's 13456-3-234
nofor word you’s 13456-3-234
nofor word you've 13456-3-1236-15
nofor word you’ve 13456-3-1236-15

contraction b
contraction c
contraction d
contraction e
contraction f
contraction g
contraction h
contraction j
contraction k
contraction l
contraction m
contraction n
contraction p
contraction q
contraction r
contraction s
contraction t
contraction u
contraction v
contraction w
contraction x
contraction y
contraction z

contraction B
contraction C
contraction D
contraction E
contraction F
contraction G
contraction H
contraction J
contraction K
contraction L
contraction M
contraction N
contraction P
contraction Q
contraction R
contraction S
contraction T
contraction U
contraction V
contraction W
contraction X
contraction Y
contraction Z


#   10.2   Strong Wordsigns
#   - 10.2.1   standing alone
#   - 10.2.2   followed by 'd, 'll, 're, 's, 't, 've and standing alone
#   - 2.6.4

match %[^_~]%<* child (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 16
match %[^_~]%<* out (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1256
match %[^_~]%<* shall (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 146
match %[^_~]%<* still (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 34
match %[^_~]%<* this (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 1456
match %[^_~]%<* which (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 156

nofor word child  16
nofor word out  1256
nofor word shall  146
nofor word still  34
nofor word this  1456
nofor word which  156

nofor word child's 16-3-234
nofor word child’s 16-3-234
nofor word out's 1256-3-234
nofor word out’s 1256-3-234
nofor word shall've 146-3-1236-15
nofor word shall’ve 146-3-1236-15
nofor word still's 34-3-234
nofor word still’s 34-3-234
nofor word this'd 1456-3-145
nofor word this’d 1456-3-145
nofor word this'll 1456-3-123-123
nofor word this’ll 1456-3-123-123
nofor word this's 1456-3-234
nofor word this’s 1456-3-234
nofor word which'd 156-3-145
nofor word which’d 156-3-145
nofor word which'll 156-3-123-123
nofor word which’ll 156-3-123-123
nofor word which're 156-3-1235-15
nofor word which’re 156-3-1235-15
nofor word which's 156-3-234
nofor word which’s 156-3-234
nofor word which've 156-3-1236-15
nofor word which’ve 156-3-1236-15

#   10.3   Strong Contractions
#   - 10.11.2

# and
always and 12346

# for
always for 123456

# of
always of 12356
always ofor 135-123456  in OFOR, the FOR sign takes  priority

match - aero [FWfw] 1-12456-135
match - antero [FWfw] 1-1345-2345-12456-135
match - auto [FWfw] =
match - benzo [FWfw] 12-26-1356-135
match - bio [FWfw] =
match - chloro [FWfw] 16-123-135-1235-135
match - deutero [FWfw] 145-15-136-2345-12456-135
match - electro [FWfw] =
match - fibro [FWfw] =
match - fluoro [FWfw] =
match - galvano [FWfw] =
match - griseo [FWfw] =
match - hetero [FWfw] 125-15-2345-12456-135
match - homo [FWfw] =
match - hydro [FWfw] =
match - hypo [FWfw] =
match - kilo [FWfw] =
match - luteo [FWfw] =
match - macro [FWfw] =
match - micro [FWfw] =
match - mono [FWfw] =
match - myelo [FWfw] =
match - myo [Ff] =
match - nano [FWfw] = 
match - nitro [FWfw] =
match - octo [FWfw] =
match - photo [FWfw] =
match - pico [FWfw] =
match - proto [FWfw] =
match - pseudo [FWfw] =
match - psycho [FWfw] 1234-234-13456-16-135
match - retro [FWfw] =
match - sulfo [FWfw] =
match - sulpho [FWfw] =
match - synchro [FWfw] 234-13456-1345-16-1235-135
match - thermo [FWfw] 2346-1235-134-135
match - thio [Ff][Uu][Rr] 1456-24-135
match - ventro [FWfw] 1236-26-2345-1235-135

sufword cofactor =
sufword cofather 14-135-5-124
sufword cofeatur 14-135-124-2-2345-136-1235
sufword coferment 14-135-124-12456-56-2345
sufword cofield =
sufword cofight 14-135-124-24-126-2345
sufword cofinal 14-135-124-35-1-123
sufword cofinance 14-135-124-35-46-15
sufword cofinancing 14-135-124-35-1-1345-14-346
sufword cofound 14-135-124-46-145
sufword cofunction 14-135-124-136-1345-14-56-1345
sufword filofax 124-24-123-135-124-1-1346
sufword insofar 35-234-135-124-345
sufword portofino 1234-135-1235-2345-135-124-35-135
sufword riboflavin 1235-24-12-135-124-123-1-1236-35
sufword styrofoam 34-13456-1235-135-124-135-1-134
sufword turbofan =
sufword twofer 2345-2456-135-124-12456
sufword twofold 2345-2456-135-124-135-123-145

# the
always the 2346

match %a thead - 2345-125-2-145
match %a thear [Tt] 2345-125-15-345
match %a theim - =

match - esthe [STst][EIei] 15-234-2346

sufword calisthenic 14-1-123-24-234-2346-1345-24-14
sufword demosthenes 145-15-134-135-234-2346-1345-15-234
sufword eratosthenes 12456-1-2345-135-234-2346-1345-15-234
sufword esther 15-234-2346-1235
sufword hesther 125-15-234-2346-1235
sufword motheaten 134-135-1456-2-2345-26
sufword northeast 1345-135-1235-1456-2-34
sufword northesk 1345-135-1235-1456-15-234-13
sufword prostheses 1234-1235-135-234-2346-234-15-234
sufword prosthesis 1234-1235-135-234-2346-234-24-234
sufword prosthetic 1234-1235-135-234-2346-2345-24-14
sufword southeast 234-1256-1456-2-34
sufword southend 234-1256-1456-26-145
sufword southesk 234-1256-1456-15-234-13
sufword strathearn 34-1235-1-1456-15-345-1345
sufword thence 1456-56-15

# with
always with 23456


#   10.4   Strong Groupsigns
#   - 10.4.2    ch sh th wh ou st
#   - 10.4.3    ing
#   - 10.11.2   ch gh sh th wh
#   - 2.6.4     referred from 10.4.2 - 10.2
